District of Columbia statutes.
19-1308.14

Discretionary powers; tax savings.

(a)

Notwithstanding the breadth of discretion granted to a trustee in the terms of the trust, including the use of such terms as “absolute”, “sole”, or “uncontrolled”, the trustee shall exercise a discretionary power in good faith and in accordance with the terms and purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries.

(b)

Section 21-1722 applies to a trust governed by this chapter.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 814 of the Uniform Trust Code.

Editor's Notes